District of Columbia statutes.
38-1701.01

Repealed

Definitions

Repealed.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-135, § 101, 43 DCR 1699
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-268, § 3(a), 54 DCR 833
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 803, 54 DCR 4102
1981 Ed., § 31-2801.